District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

38-1808.51

Commission on Consensus Reform in the District of Columbia Public Schools.

Expired.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [272], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2852

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.81.